Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.450

Hearing procedure—Inclusion of property—Examination of reports—Recess.

At the hearing, the county legislative authority shall first provide for an explanation of the objectives of the proposed park and recreation service area and the estimated initial costs thereof. The county legislative authority shall permit any resident or property owner of the proposed service area to appear and be heard, and may permit property owners in contiguous areas to include their property within the proposed service area in the event that they make their request for inclusion in writing. The county legislative authority shall examine all reports on the feasibility of the proposed service area and its initial costs and may, if they deem it necessary, recess the hearing for not more than twenty days to obtain any additional information necessary to arrive at the findings provided for in RCW 36.68.420.

[ 1981 c 210 s 5; 1963 c 218 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 210: See note following RCW 36.68.400.